North Carolina, session 2025, HB739.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of sixty-one million three hundred thousand dollars
($61,300,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide directed grants as
follows:
(1) Two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) to the Town of
Lucama for water infrastructure.
(2) Four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000) to the Town of
Stantonsburg for water and sewer projects.
(3) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) to Wilson County for allocation to the
County's volunteer fire departments.
(4) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to Wilson County for school
construction.
(5) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to Wilson County for the construction
of a new courthouse.
(6) Eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) to Wilson County for the Sheriff's
Office Training Center.
(7) One million dollars ($1,000,000) to Wilson County to provide Narcan for the
Wilson County schools and Wilson County libraries.
(8) Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) to the Wilson Housing Authority.
(9) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) to Wilson County for the Wilson Ride
Program.
(10) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to the Town of
Sharpsburg for the construction of a new Police Department.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H739-v-1*